hunspell/kk/kk.aff
SFX G N 54
SFX G 0 дің [әеёиөүіюя]ж
SFX G 0 дің [әеёиөүіюя]з
SFX G 0 дің [әеёиөүіюя]й
SFX G 0 дің [әеёиөүіюя]л
SFX G 0 дің [әеёиөүіюя]м
SFX G 0 дің [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX G 0 дың [аоуұыэ]ж
SFX G 0 дың [аоуұыэ]з
SFX G 0 дың [аоуұыэ]й
SFX G 0 дың [аоуұыэ]л
SFX G 0 дың [аоуұыэ]м
SFX G 0 дың [аоуұыэ]у
SFX G 0 нің [әеёиөүіюя]
SFX G 0 нің [әеёиөүіюя]н
SFX G 0 нің [әеёиөүіюя]ң
SFX G 0 нің [әеёиөүіюя]р
SFX G 0 ның [аоуұыэ]
SFX G 0 ның [аоуұыэ]н
SFX G 0 ның [аоуұыэ]ң
SFX G 0 ның [аоуұыэ]р
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]б
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]в
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]г
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]ғ
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]д
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]к
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]қ
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]һ
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]п
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]с
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]т
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]ф
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]х
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]ц
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]ч
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]ш
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]щ
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]б
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]в
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]г
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]ғ
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]д
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]к
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]қ
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]һ
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]п
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]с
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]т
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]ф
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]х
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]ц
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]ч
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]ш
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]щ
SFX g N 54
SFX g 0 дардың [аоуұыэ]ж
SFX g 0 дардың [аоуұыэ]з
SFX g 0 дардың [аоуұыэ]л
SFX g 0 дардың [аоуұыэ]м
SFX g 0 дердің [әеёиөүіюя]ж
SFX g 0 дердің [әеёиөүіюя]з
SFX g 0 дердің [әеёиөүіюя]л
SFX g 0 дердің [әеёиөүіюя]м
SFX g 0 лардың [аоуұыэ]
SFX g 0 лардың [аоуұыэ]й
SFX g 0 лардың [аоуұыэ]н
SFX g 0 лардың [аоуұыэ]ң
SFX g 0 лардың [аоуұыэ]р
SFX g 0 лардың [аоуұыэ]у
SFX g 0 лердің [әеёиөүіюя]
SFX g 0 лердің [әеёиөүіюя]й
SFX g 0 лердің [әеёиөүіюя]н
SFX g 0 лердің [әеёиөүіюя]ң
SFX g 0 лердің [әеёиөүіюя]р
SFX g 0 лердің [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]б
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]в
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]г
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]ғ
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]д
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]к
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]қ
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]һ
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]п
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]с
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]т
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]ф
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]х
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]ц
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]ч
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]ш
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]щ
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]б
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]в
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]г
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]ғ
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]д
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]к
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]қ
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]һ
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]п
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]с
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]т
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]ф
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]х
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]ц
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]ч
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]ш
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]щ
SFX H N 54
SFX H 0 ға [аоуұыэ]
SFX H 0 ға [аоуұыэ]ж
SFX H 0 ға [аоуұыэ]з
SFX H 0 ға [аоуұыэ]й
SFX H 0 ға [аоуұыэ]л
SFX H 0 ға [аоуұыэ]м
SFX H 0 ға [аоуұыэ]н
SFX H 0 ға [аоуұыэ]ң
SFX H 0 ға [аоуұыэ]р
SFX H 0 ға [аоуұыэ]у
SFX H 0 ге [әеёиөүіюя]
SFX H 0 ге [әеёиөүіюя]ж
SFX H 0 ге [әеёиөүіюя]з
SFX H 0 ге [әеёиөүіюя]й
SFX H 0 ге [әеёиөүіюя]л
SFX H 0 ге [әеёиөүіюя]м
SFX H 0 ге [әеёиөүіюя]н
SFX H 0 ге [әеёиөүіюя]ң
SFX H 0 ге [әеёиөүіюя]р
SFX H 0 ге [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]б
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]в
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]г
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]ғ
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]д
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]к
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]қ
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]һ
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]п
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]с
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]т
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]ф
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]х
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]ц
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]ч
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]ш
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]щ
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]б
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]в
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]г
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]ғ
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]д
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]к
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]қ
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]һ
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]п
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]с
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]т
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]ф
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]х
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]ц
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]ч
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]ш
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]щ
SFX h N 54
SFX h 0 дарға [аоуұыэ]ж
SFX h 0 дарға [аоуұыэ]з
SFX h 0 дарға [аоуұыэ]л
SFX h 0 дарға [аоуұыэ]м
SFX h 0 дарға [аоуұыэ]н
SFX h 0 дарға [аоуұыэ]ң
SFX h 0 дерге [әеёиөүіюя]ж
SFX h 0 дерге [әеёиөүіюя]з
SFX h 0 дерге [әеёиөүіюя]л
SFX h 0 дерге [әеёиөүіюя]м
SFX h 0 дерге [әеёиөүіюя]н
SFX h 0 дерге [әеёиөүіюя]ң
SFX h 0 ларға [аоуұыэ]
SFX h 0 ларға [аоуұыэ]й
SFX h 0 ларға [аоуұыэ]р
SFX h 0 ларға [аоуұыэ]у
SFX h 0 лерге [әеёиөүіюя]
SFX h 0 лерге [әеёиөүіюя]й
SFX h 0 лерге [әеёиөүіюя]р
SFX h 0 лерге [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]б
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]в
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]г
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]ғ
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]д
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]к
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]қ
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]һ
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]п
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]с
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]т
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]ф
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]х
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]ц
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]ч
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]ш
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]щ
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]б
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]в
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]г
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]ғ
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]д
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]к
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]қ
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]һ
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]п
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]с
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]т
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]ф
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]х
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]ц
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]ч
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]ш
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]щ
SFX I N 54
SFX I 0 ді [әеёиөүіюя]ж
SFX I 0 ді [әеёиөүіюя]з
SFX I 0 ді [әеёиөүіюя]й
SFX I 0 ді [әеёиөүіюя]л
SFX I 0 ді [әеёиөүіюя]м
SFX I 0 ді [әеёиөүіюя]н
SFX I 0 ді [әеёиөүіюя]ң
SFX I 0 ді [әеёиөүіюя]р
SFX I 0 ді [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX I 0 ды [аоуұыэ]ж
SFX I 0 ды [аоуұыэ]з
SFX I 0 ды [аоуұыэ]й
SFX I 0 ды [аоуұыэ]л
SFX I 0 ды [аоуұыэ]м
SFX I 0 ды [аоуұыэ]н
SFX I 0 ды [аоуұыэ]ң
SFX I 0 ды [аоуұыэ]р
SFX I 0 ды [аоуұыэ]у
SFX I 0 ні [әеёиөүіюя]
SFX I 0 ны [аоуұыэ]
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]б
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]в
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]г
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]ғ
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]д
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]к
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]қ
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]һ
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]п
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]с
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]т
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]ф
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]х
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]ц
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]ч
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]ш
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]щ
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]б
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]в
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]г
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]ғ
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]д
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]к
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]қ
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]һ
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]п
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]с
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]т
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]ф
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]х
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]ц
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]ч
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]ш
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]щ
SFX i N 54
SFX i 0 дарды [аоуұыэ]ж
SFX i 0 дарды [аоуұыэ]з
SFX i 0 дарды [аоуұыэ]л
SFX i 0 дарды [аоуұыэ]м
SFX i 0 дарды [аоуұыэ]н
SFX i 0 дарды [аоуұыэ]ң
SFX i 0 дерді [әеёиөүіюя]ж
SFX i 0 дерді [әеёиөүіюя]з
SFX i 0 дерді [әеёиөүіюя]л
SFX i 0 дерді [әеёиөүіюя]м
SFX i 0 дерді [әеёиөүіюя]н
SFX i 0 дерді [әеёиөүіюя]ң
SFX i 0 ларды [аоуұыэ]
SFX i 0 ларды [аоуұыэ]й
SFX i 0 ларды [аоуұыэ]р
SFX i 0 ларды [аоуұыэ]у
SFX i 0 лерді [әеёиөүіюя]
SFX i 0 лерді [әеёиөүіюя]й
SFX i 0 лерді [әеёиөүіюя]р
SFX i 0 лерді [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]б
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]в
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]г
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]ғ
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]д
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]к
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]қ
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]һ
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]п
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]с
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]т
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]ф
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]х
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]ц
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]ч
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]ш
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]щ
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]б
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]в
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]г
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]ғ
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]д
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]к
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]қ
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]һ
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]п
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]с
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]т
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]ф
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]х
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]ц
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]ч
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]ш
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]щ
